New York, session 2025-2026, A1812.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 240 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 1-c to read as follows: 3 1-c. At every hearing for the adjudication of a notice of liability, 4 as provided by this article, there shall be a rebuttable presumption 5 that an owner of a motor vehicle who is a licensed midwife, alleged to 6 be liable in accordance with any provisions of law specifically author- 7 izing the imposition of monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for 8 failure of an operator thereof: to comply with traffic-control indi- 9 cations in violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven 10 of this chapter through the installation and operation of traffic-con- 11 trol signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance with arti- 12 cle twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with certain posted maxi- 13 mum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) 14 of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter through the installa- 15 tion and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in 16 accordance with article thirty of this chapter; or to comply with bus 17 lane restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter 18 through the installation and operation of bus lane photo devices, in 19 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, is not liable for 20 such alleged violation if such owner provides the hearing officer with a 21 signed and affirmed affidavit attesting that such owner is a midwife, 22 and was responding to an emergency medical situation at the time that EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04228-01-5 A. 1812 2 1 the alleged violation occurred, or such other proof as such hearing 2 officer deems appropriate. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 4 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 5 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 6 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 7 completed on or before such effective date.